Louisiana, session 2026, SB292.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 49:220.21, 220.23, and 220.24 are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§220.21. Office of the state inspector general; policy and purpose
A. The prevention and detection of waste, inefficiencies, mismanagement,
misconduct, abuse, fraud, and corruption in all departments, offices, agencies,
boards, commissions, task forces, authorities, and divisions of the executive branch
of state government as specifically provided in Title 36 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, all hereinafter referred to in this Part collectively as "covered
agencies" and individually as "covered agency", is an important responsibility of the
state. The efficient and optimal execution of legislative will is an important
responsibility of the executive branch. The executive branch is compelled to find
efficiency and optimization, to detect waste, inefficiency, and mismanagement,
and to prevent misconduct, abuse, fraud, and corruption in all departments,
offices, agencies, boards, commissions, task forces, authorities, and divisions of
the executive branch of state government as specifically provided in Title 36 of
the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, referred to in this Part collectively as
Page 1 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 292 ENROLLED
"covered agencies" and individually as "covered agency".
B. In view of the responsibility of the state, it is the purpose of this Part to
establish an independent office of the state inspector general in the office of the
governor to examine and investigate the management and affairs of covered
agencies.
* * *
§220.23. State inspector general and chief integrity officer; appointment; term;
vacancy; compensation; removal
A.(1) There shall be a state inspector general, hereinafter referred to as the
"inspector general" and "chief integrity officer", who shall be appointed by the
governor with the consent of the Senate. No person appointed inspector general shall
hold or be a candidate for any elective office, including elective political party office,
or any other public office or political party office. No person shall be appointed
inspector general who has held any elective office or political party office within two
years immediately preceding his appointment. No former inspector general shall be
eligible to qualify as a candidate for any elective office, including elective political
party office, nor shall he assume any elective office or political party office within
four years after the termination of his service as inspector general.
(2) If a vacancy exists in the office of the state inspector general for more
than six months, then the holder of the next highest level administrative position in
the office shall become the inspector general, subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(3) Not later than one year from the date of appointment, if not already
certified, the inspector general shall obtain certification as a Certified Inspector
General from the Association of Inspectors General.
B. The inspector general shall serve a six-year term.
C. The salary of the inspector general shall be fixed by the governor, which
amount shall not exceed the amount approved for such position by the legislature
while in session. The salary of the inspector general may not be reduced by the
governor or the legislature during his term of office.
D.(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection B of this Section, the
Page 2 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 292 ENROLLED
inspector general may be removed by the governor provided such removal is
approved by a majority vote of each house of the legislature.
(2) In order to obtain the consent of a majority of the elected members of
each house of the legislature, the clerk of the House of Representatives and the
secretary of the Senate shall prepare and transmit a ballot to each member of the
legislature by certified mail with return receipt requested, unless it is determined that
the legislature will be in session in time for the ballots to be distributed to them and
returned by them during the session. The ballot shall be uniform and include
pertinent information as the clerk and secretary shall determine.
§220.24. Authority; duties; powers; standards; functions
A. The inspector general shall serve as the executive head and chief
administrative officer of the office and shall have responsibility for the policies of
the office, except as otherwise provided by this Part, and for the administration,
control, and operation of the functions and affairs of the office.
B. The inspector general is authorized to examine and investigate the
management and affairs of the covered agencies concerning waste, inefficiencies,
mismanagement, misconduct, abuse, fraud, and corruption, to find efficiency and
optimization, to detect waste, inefficiency, and mismanagement, and to prevent
misconduct, abuse, fraud, and corruption; and he may conduct all necessary
investigations into such areas, including but not limited to: for the purpose of:
(1) Misuse of state-owned automobiles, planes, watercraft, and all other
movable and immovable property.
(2) Evidence of a pattern of excessive bills on state contracts.
(3) Unauthorized use of leave.
(4) Mismanagement of governmental operations.
(5) Waste or abuse of things of value belonging to or used by the covered
agencies.
(6) Construction, operation, and maintenance of facilities.
(1) Eliminating wasteful spending.
(2) Improving government efficiency.
Page 3 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 292 ENROLLED
(3) Optimizing and modernizing government operations.
C.(1) The inspector general shall help prevent waste, inefficiency,
mismanagement, misconduct, abuse, fraud, and corruption in covered agencies by
periodically reviewing policies and procedures and monitoring operations and
making recommendations for improvement.
(2) The inspector general shall receive complaints of waste, inefficiency,
mismanagement, misconduct, abuse, fraud, or corruption in covered agencies and
determine whether they warrant investigation by the inspector general or by
appropriate federal, state, or local agencies or may conduct such investigations upon
his own initiative. In order to accomplish this, the office of the inspector general
shall maintain a toll-free fraud hotline number and web site website for anonymous
reporting complaints.
(3) The inspector general shall investigate complaints of waste, inefficiencies,
mismanagement, misconduct, abuse, fraud, and corruption and, when appropriate,
recommend whether disciplinary action or further investigation by appropriate
federal, state, or local agencies is warranted and take further action as appropriate.
(4) The inspector general shall report complaints of fraud, abuse, or
corruption to such federal, state, or local agencies when there is evidence of what
may be criminal activity and when otherwise appropriate and shall otherwise
cooperate with such agencies in any further action.
(5) The inspector general shall make reports of his findings to the governor.
Such reports shall be subject to the provisions of R.S. 44:1 et seq.
(6) The inspector general shall submit an annual report to the governor and
the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget at the end of each fiscal year that
describes the accomplishments and contributions made by the office toward
achieving the mission of helping to prevent and detect waste, fraud, and abuse in
Louisiana government. Upon completion, as indicated by signature of the inspector
general, all final reports of the inspector general immediately shall be filed with the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget and shall include the response of the
agency, if any. All such reports shall be provided to the staff of the governor's office
Page 4 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 292 ENROLLED
and the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget upon request.
D. The inspector general shall provide for an opportunity for agency response
to respond prior to the release of a report unless the inspector general, in conjunction
with a United States attorney, the state attorney general, district attorneys, or other
prosecutorial agencies, determines that supplying the affected person or entity with
such report will jeopardize a pending or potential criminal investigation. (1) The
inspector general shall submit an annual report to the governor and the Joint
Legislative Committee on the Budget at the end of each fiscal year that
describes the accomplishments and contributions made by the office toward
achieving the mission of helping to prevent and detect waste, fraud, and abuse
in Louisiana government.
(2) The inspector general shall make reports of his findings to the
governor. Such reports shall be subject to the provisions of R.S. 44:1 et seq. The
inspector general shall provide for an opportunity for a covered agency to
respond prior to release of a report unless the inspector general, in consultation
with a United States attorney, the state attorney general, district attorney, or
other prosecutorial agencies, determines that supplying the affected person or
covered agency with such report will jeopardize a pending or potential criminal
investigation. Upon completion, as indicated by the signature of the inspector
general, all final reports of the inspector general shall be filed immediately with
the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget and shall include the response
of the covered agency, if any.
E. All officers and employees of covered agencies shall extend full
cooperation and all reasonable assistance to the inspector general.
F.(1) In the performance of his duties, the inspector general and any member
of his staff designated by him may seek and obtain sworn testimony from any person
using the same procedure as is provided for taking depositions provided for in
Article 1443 in the Code of Civil Procedure Article 1443.
(2) In the performance of his duties, the inspector general or any member of
his staff designated by him may compel the attendance of witnesses to be deposed
Page 5 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 292 ENROLLED
under oath or the production of public and private records by issuing a subpoena.
However, such a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum shall be issued only upon
approval of a judge of the district court of the parish in which the office of inspector
general is domiciled upon application in writing by the inspector general. The judge
shall issue a written decision within seventy-two hours after receipt of such
application. Any subpoena for production of private records shall be in compliance
with all applicable constitutionally established rights and processes. The subpoena
may be served by certified mail, return receipt requested, at the addressee's residence
or business address, or by representatives appointed by the inspector general, or may
be directed for service to the office of the state police. If a person refuses to obey a
subpoena issued by the inspector general, upon application by the inspector general,
the district court of the parish in which the office of inspector general is domiciled
may issue an order to the person requiring the person to appear before the court to
show cause why an order shall not be issued ordering such person to obey the
subpoena, and the person may be adjudged in contempt of court.
(3)G. The inspector general shall have access to all records, information,
data, reports, plans, projections, matters, contracts, memoranda, correspondence, and
any other materials of a covered agency and shall be deemed to be an authorized
representative and agent of each covered agency for the purposes of:
(a)(1) Examining and investigating the records of all contractors,
subcontractors, grantees, or subgrantees of covered agencies, which records relate
to contracts, subcontracts, grants, or subgrants with a covered agency.
(b)(2) Obtaining access to any records of a covered agency in the possession
of a third party, including but not limited to bank account records.
G.H. The inspector general and employees of the inspector general shall
carry identifying cards.
H.I. The office of the state inspector general shall adhere to professional
standards for initiating and conducting audits, investigations, inspections, and
reviews such as those promulgated by the Association of Inspectors General. The
office shall develop an operations manual that contains such standards and shall
Page 6 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 292 ENROLLED
make it available to the public.
I.J. The inspector general shall engage in prevention activities, including but
not limited to reviewing legislation, rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and
transactions; providing for training and education; and making recommendations to
the governor and the legislature to strengthen public integrity laws.
J.K. The office of the state inspector general is hereby designated as a law
enforcement agency and conferred all investigative powers and privileges
appurtenant to a law enforcement agency under state law as necessary and in
furtherance of the authority, duties, powers, and functions set forth in this Part. These
powers and privileges shall not include arrest powers but shall include access to
computer systems, information maintained for the use of law enforcement personnel,
and any information contained in the criminal history record and identification file
of the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information. These powers
shall not include arrest powers.
K.L. Upon credible information of corruption or fraud, the office of the state
inspector general shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agencies. Subsequent
to notifying the appropriate law enforcement agency, the inspector general may assist
the law enforcement agency in conducting the investigation. Upon detecting a
violation of one of the provisions of the Code of Governmental Ethics, the office of
the state inspector general may file a complaint with the Board of Ethics.
L.M. The office of the state inspector general may conduct joint
investigations and projects with other oversight or law enforcement agencies.
M.N. In order to fulfill the requirements of this Part, the inspector
general shall have the authority to contract for such professional services,
without public bid, as are reasonably necessary.
O. The inspector general shall do all things necessary to carry out the
functions set forth in this Part.
Section 2. R.S. 49:220.26 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 7 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 292 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 8 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.